Washington statutes.
RCW 10.64.025

Detention of defendant.

(1) A defendant who has been found guilty of a felony and is awaiting sentencing shall be detained unless the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the defendant is not likely to flee or to pose a danger to the safety of any other person or the community if released. Any bail bond that was posted on behalf of a defendant shall, upon the defendant's conviction, be exonerated.

(2) A defendant who has been found guilty of one of the following offenses shall be detained pending sentencing: Rape in the first or second degree (RCW 9A.44.040 and 9A.44.050); rape of a child in the first, second, or third degree (RCW 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, and 9A.44.079); child molestation in the first, second, or third degree (RCW 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, and 9A.44.089); sexual misconduct with a minor in the first or second degree (RCW 9A.44.093 and 9A.44.096); indecent liberties (RCW 9A.44.100); incest (RCW 9A.64.020); luring (RCW 9A.40.090); human trafficking in the first or second degree (RCW 9A.40.100); promoting commercial sexual abuse of a minor (RCW 9.68A.101); any class A or B felony that is a sexually motivated offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; a felony violation of RCW 9.68A.090; or any offense that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit one of those offenses.

[ 2011 c 111 s 4; 1996 c 275 s 10; 1989 c 276 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—1996 c 275: See note following RCW 9.94A.505.

Severability—1989 c 276: See note following RCW 9.95.062.